New York, session 2025-2026, S9455.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 590 of the labor law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) In addition to any benefits provided under paragraph (a) of this 4 subdivision, a claimant who claimed dependents on their state income tax 5 return filed in the tax year preceding the year in which the valid 6 original unemployment claim was approved shall be eligible to receive a 7 dependent allowance. Such dependent allowance shall be an amount equal 8 to five percent of the average weekly wage for the current benefit year 9 multiplied by the number of dependents claimed in the preceding tax 10 year. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14868-01-6